South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4731.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 15, Title 60 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 60-15-25.  On January 1, 2027, the South Carolina Arts Commission is abolished and all functions, powers, and duties provided by law to the commission are hereby transferred to the South Carolina Department of Education, and these functions, powers, and duties are devolved upon the department, and the commission records, property, and unexpended appropriations also are transferred to the department. All rules, regulations, standards, orders, or other actions of the commission shall remain in effect unless specifically changed or voided by the department in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act. SECTION 2.  Section 60-15-10 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 60-15-10.  It is hereby declared to be the policy of the State to join with private patrons and with institutions and professional organizations concerned with the arts to insure that the role of the arts in the life of our communities will continue to grow and play an ever more significant part in the welfare and educational experience of our citizens.  It is further declared that all activities undertaken by the State in carrying out this policy shall be directed toward encouraging and assisting rather than limiting the freedom of artistic expression that is essential for the well-being of the arts.It is hereby declared that the policy of the State is to cooperate with public and private schools, local governments, community institutions, and organizations to foster the arts as an important component of the cultural, educational, and economic life of this State. The General Assembly finds that the arts enrich communities, support civic pride, and preserve the historical and cultural heritage of South Carolina. SECTION 3.  Section 60-15-90 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 60-15-90.  The CommissionState Department of Education shall be the official agency of the State to receive and disburse any funds made available by the Federal Government for programs related to the creative and interpretive arts. SECTION 4.  Section 60-15-60 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 60-15-60.  The duties of the commission State Superintendent of Education shall include but not be limited to the following: (1) Toto stimulate and encourage throughout the State the study and presentation of the performing and fine arts and public interest and participation therein including, but not limited to, music, theater, dance, painting, sculpture, architecture and allied arts and crafts; (2) To make such studies as may be deemed advisable of public and private institutions engaged within the State in artistic and cultural activities, including but not limited to music, theater, dance, painting, sculpture, architecture and allied arts and crafts, and to make recommendations concerning appropriate methods to encourage participation in and appreciation of the arts to meet the legitimate needs and aspirations of persons in all parts of the Stateto advance the arts as a valuable component of a well-rounded education; (3) Toto take such steps as may be necessary and appropriate to encourage public interest in the cultural heritage of the State of South Carolina and to expand the State's cultural resources; and (4) Toto do such other things as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 5.  Section 60-15-80 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 60-15-80.  The commissionState Department of Education shall make an annual report to the Governor and the legislature and shall make such other reports as it deems necessary. SECTION 6.  Chapter 15, Title 60 of the S.C. Code is redesignated "South Carolina Arts Initiatives." SECTION 7.  Sections 60-15-20, 60-15-30, 60-15-40, 60-15-50, 60-15-70, and 60-15-75 of the S.C. Code are repealed. SECTION 8.  This act takes effect on January 1, 2027. ----XX----